Pet dog of a three-year-girl who spent 16 hours in the elements has stayed by her side until she was found this morning.

 Or to mention the dog was 17 and partially blind.
Same thing happened to my brother growing up in Hong Kong. He wandered off into the mountains and our family dog stayed with him for an entire day. My mom said the whole village was looking for him and he just came strolling back in the middle of the night with the dog by his side. 
He looks like a blue heeler mix! Loved mine. That dog was SO loyal, or he just had severe separation anxiety.
"The alarm was raised after the child couldn't be found about 5pm, sparking a largescale search involving SES crews and two helicopters."

Poor doggo thinks he's off for a walk that turns into a 16 hour cluster and doesn't even get his own helicopter 
Finally answered the question - who’s a good dog?
What is around the dog's neck? Looks like some sort of lock?
This is like Homeward Bound when they find the little girl lost in the wilderness. 
Article says the property has 17 dams? 
Good ol herding breeds.  They will stay with you til the end.  
I'm reminded of a similar story that happened in my area a few years ago, although with a less happy outcome. A mentally handicapped boy wandered into the woods on a frigid night, followed by his dog. The dog came home the following day, and led searchers to the body of the boy. They could see the outline of the dog's body in the snow next to the boy, so at least he died with his best friend to comfort him. Just typing this is making me choke up again. Dogs are the best. 
My cat would have eaten me by then. 
His expression in that picture makes it look like he knows he fulfilled his life's purpose. What a good fucking boy!
Time to fire up a ribeye for this hero. Both were probably really scared but each other’s company got them thru it. Dogs are the best!!
Good doggo. Lots of treats and toys. 
Dogs are SUCH bros. We truly don't deserve them. Children do, but not adults, we are too corrupt and evil
They're good dogs brent
Why was she walking the dog at 3yo?
I get it that it might be a little bit noteworthy if she would have died and the dog would have stayed there until they were found, but, it seems completely normal to me that the dog would stay with her the whole time she was out with it. 

What kind of dog would just run off and leave you?
Oh, fer-- I thought the map showed how far she'd walked! 
What an *excellent* boy.
Why the hell was a child that young allowed to go out unsupervised?
And on this day let it be known, many treats were had!
This happened to me as a kid. .. twice. Although I was only lost for a couple hours. Both times, a dog brought me home. Different dogs, too.
Can we please use coherent grammar in the titles?
I grew up with dogs that were like this with my sister and myself. They were the best.

I now have a beagle. Should any future child, or myself get lost and need my beagle to protect me, we will be fucked, as he will be off following his nose and forget all about me. 
Wow, I can't imagine the relief and happiness the family must have felt upon finding her. Beautiful end to the story. 
The irony of OP's username is too much.
Your user name is completely accurate.
What does "in the elements" mean?
I mean, where was he gonna go?
Can't believe Warwick is in the News.


I’m sorry but I think I’m confused..... why was a three year-old walking a dog all alone?! Who was she looking for? What?!
Who's a good boy?! Who's a good boy!? You're a good boy! Yes you are! Yes you are!! 
We don't deserve dogs.
That dog looks just like my brother's dog.  His name is Argyle, glad to see an Argyle saved someone! 

(I know it's a blue heeler mix, but we just call them Argyles)
Just one  reason why Heelers are the best ! My good boi Willie went to the rainbow  bridge  five years ago, and I am tearing up just thinking about him.
This is the time you will realized that your dog is not just a pet but a part of your family too.
I’ve said it once and i’ll say it again, Humans do not deserve dogs.
ACD, so loyal. I need to go hug my good boy now. 
So they call  "Australian Cattle Dogs" just "cattle dogs" in Australia? :D
Mister misty eyes therfore I.. 
OP's user name checks out
Who’s a good boy 

Someone deserves a steak
Fucking Lassy. You're supposed to get help.
Max is such a good D-O-DOUBLE-G-I-E
100% would pet hero boye!
What a heartwarming story 💕💕💕 made my day!
We don't deserve dogs 
That’s awesome; but what else would you expect? 
The thought of them sleeping together and him keeping her warm makes me smile 
"in the elements" lol. When we are having fun outside it's "in nature" but when someone is lost it's "the elements". 
I like how the ads on that website just kind of went by as you scroll in the background instead of like American news websites were 17 pop up on mobile and you can't even use the damn website.
We don't deserve dogs.
In the elements? 

You mean, outside?
They really **need** thermal imaging on rescue helicopters.
At what point do we refer to "outside" as "the elements?"

I'm about to spend a few hours working outside in the elements of a pretty nice day.  Just have to finish pooping first.  Then, a shot of vodka and time to fix the fence in the elements.
A cat wouldn’t have done that
Three-year-girls are the best. 
He looks wise and badass like Clint Eastwood. What a goodboy
Blue Heelers are the best. 

[Bluey has the record for oldest dog ever at 29yrs](https://www.mnn.com/family/pets/photos/15-pets-with-guinness-world-records/oldest-dog)

Also, this one [fell off a boat, swam 5 miles and lived on a deserted island eating baby goats for 4 months before being found](https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/australiaandthepacific/australia/5113781/Pet-dog-survives-four-months-lost-at-sea-off-Australia.html)
Dog does what dogs do, on the news at 10.
Who lets their three year old go for a walk?
Why the hell was a 3 year old left walking alone on a property that sounded that dangerous?
Cute story but c'mon, the dog was deaf and partially blind, his best bet was to stick with the girl. Title should be "three year old keeps senior dog safe after she gets them lost"

Then the grandmother finds them? A huge search party and the grandma is the one to find them, hmmmm.
Dogs are the best... My father told me when I was young.  To lock my wife in the trunk of the car and my dog another one wait an hour then open .... Guess which one will be happy to see you?  That's the one you keep
Nothing more loyal than Doggo's. NOTHING.
I knew upon reading the caption that this was a story from Australia.
This actually brought a tear to my eye, I'm just glad something like this has turned out well in the end.
He’s the bestest goodest boy ever! ❤️❤️ Steak every day for him!!
everyone is okay too :D
That pup looks like it appreciates a good scratch behind the ear and massaging of the hips,
This is great and all..... but who lets a 3yo take a dog for a walk?
aww dogs are the best I know a bear wouldn’t do this 
Looks like that dog from Daddy's Home
No shit. That's what dogs do. Why is this a surprise to anyone? 
Good boy Max.   
    
Now let's fry him up some bacon.
Well, that's how things worked not so much time ago since millenia, I mean, it must be written in the dog's genes or something...
My dog is a younger version!
https://imgur.com/gallery/JQ4tXoj
Those “9NEWS” watermarks in the middle of the pictures are fucking obnoxious. 
Had to double take on this one, this dog looks just like my dog.
I did that too once when I was little apparently. I left my house on my trike and my dog came with me and my parents found me a few hours later with the dog by my side. 
Twist of fate: it was the dog who was lost and hoping the little girl would rescue him!
I know about a dog eating steak tonight.
My mom wouldn’t let me have a dog growing up because they shed. My mom didn’t love me. 
Blue heelers are the best. Our first family dog was an Aussie/blue heeler mix and she was the most well behaved dog I’ve met. Sure, she’d do the occasional wrong thing, but she’d sulk and wallow in her guilt until someone got onto her. She figured out how to get over our tall backyard fence. There was more than a few times we’d get off the school bus and she was waiting in the driveway. 

Thank God for blue heelers (and dogs in general!) I’m glad this little girl was found safe
 Oh yeah. Back in the early '90s up in Alaska, a guy had dropped a tree and he kinda fucked up in that it fell on him and killed him. He was the caretaker for this lodge in the off season. Just gathering firewood. So anyways, he's dead, but that Black Lab went back and forth from the accident and the bay where the boat was. That Lab went back and forth so much that the Responders said a trail was made.

 Pretty cool dog and pretty cool devotion.

 You can Google this story.
Who's a good dog?
St first it was 14 hours , then 15 hours yesterday, and now today it’s 16 hours. I know it’s only a few numbers off, but why 
'Ok, you can have a belly rub.'
This would make a great movie, Damn. She could have fallen into one of 17 dams??
That’s a good dog Brent. 
We don’t deserve dogs
In Australia too, where the majority of the ecosystem is out to kill you... 
The dog was 17? Is that considered accompanied by an adult? 
Good dog. Shit parents.
“The elements” hahah what the whole periodic table? 
I wonder how many Chinese tourists the dog fought off? 
Dog was 17, deaf, and partially blind.
I thought this was daycare in Australia
A dingo loved my baby!
Good boy--nothing! Lassie would've gone to get help.
In the elements?
It's an ACD. This is normal behavior for them. Hardly newsworthy, besides a lost kid.
This story made me miss my old german Sheffer, my best friend growing up. That dog would have attacked a pack of lions to protect me. 
No mention of the weather, though I think it was still fairly warm there.
This is like Shadow coming to the rescue in homeward bound
I’m not a parent so maybe one can answer this for me Who the fuck lets there 3 year old walk there dog on there own??? 
What is this title?
I had a blue heeled mix that was my best friend. He was the best protector and never barked incessantly. A true watcher, his bark among my two other dogs always told me there was a stranger nearby. I miss him very much. 
Good boy! But, I would expect nothing less from a dog... They're all good boys. 
we sure dont deserve dogs
I read about dogs like this then wonder wtf is wrong with mine.

Mine possesses quite literally no intelligence and is generally derpy as all fuck. I could die and the dog would just walk to the other room to eat cat shit because no one is watching.     
Everyone is talking about the dog but is no one going to mention that a 3yo went in a 3km walkabout in the bush dragging a 17yo dead and partially blind dog "looking for her mum"?

I feel like the minimum bar for being an Australian is way beyond adults in other countries.
The goodest good boy of them all
did we really need a 2th thread about this ?
At least a dingo didn’t eat the baby.  
Dog was like “where the fuck have you adults been?! I’ve had to watch your kid for hours! Call yourself parents...sheesh...”
I’m sorry, but what kind of crappy parent lets a three year old walk a dog without supervision?
agreed the parents should be charged with neglect.
“There were fears she had fallen into one of the 17 dams nearby”. WTF Australia?
People do not deserve dogs. They are the closest thing to perfect that earth has to offer.
I fucking love dogs even more than I thought was possible. 
I thought the title meant she died and I was wondering how you die after just 16 hours in the elements. 
I love animals more than I love humans for this reason.
doggo doin what doggo's do best!
How did these parents lose a 3 year old and a dog though ? 
We don’t deserve dogs and how amazing they are. Going to give mine a milk bone and some love right now
We don't deserve dogs but I'm so glad we have them.
That dog deserves a T-Bone or two..... or three
Shouldn't we be talking about the girl
What if I told you that we can talk about more than one thing 
We don't deserve dogs. Amazing story.
This dog probably kept her alive with shared body heat.

Edit: autocorrect
Im really glad the girls okay. Im in canada and I honestly wish I could spend 16 hours outside in 13 degree weather.
That's a good boy, right there
So many different titles for this BREAKING NEWS event which boils down to "Girl goes on somewhat long walk with dog."
> Remarkably, the child's only injuries were scratches and bruises from the rugged terrain.

I mean, is it really though? Children are, in their own way, though as nails and I guess a 3-year old didn't have too much exposure to human culture yet and can still work pretty well on auto-pilot.
It’s fucking Australia where everything, and possibly everyone, wants to kill you.
And yet, humans have survived there for the last 40,000 years at least.
Also she went on a long walk and fell asleep in a bush. People need to get outside more of they think that's likely to produce any serious injuries. 
Your post title is trash.
What you got? *smiling *
God dammit i love dogs. 
I'm confused as to why a 3 year old was left home alone at all, long enough for her to go looking for her mom with the family dog. 
I love dogs but some are complete babies who follow their humans everywhere. This dog could have been just as terrified as the girl. For the majority of dogs staying with their pack is their one desire, and it would be more unusual for it to strike out alone, especially if it’s old and deaf and nearly blind. 
It's an ACD. They are known as velcro dogs because they're so hardcore about their human. 
My dog is a border collie mix and she follows me everywhere, especially when we’re outside. Dogs can be intelligent and fiercely loyal. I guess it takes away from the feel good story though if this dog isn’t unique. 
I wasn't disagreeing with you. I'm sorry if it seemed that way. I was being anecdotal because ACDs are goofy leeches. Look! [I have one stuck on my back currently](https://imgur.com/TaCqAmn). :D
[Aww same](http://imgur.com/4vxa92A) I guess I was confused who was downvoting reality. 
Aww. Dogs ARE the best!
Perhaps Reddit would be a better place if people just sent each other dog pictures!
He's deaf and blind. Where through fuck was he going?  Here pet rock was also found close by. 
he family dog who is deaf and partially blind, faithfully stayed with the little girl.
All 118 of them?
Awesome. That’s just awesome. I can’t think of a better word, and I have a thesaurus 
Great story. piss poor grammar. 
Fuck yeah!

Dogs-alot
Cats- like 2
There’s no contest, this dog has to be crowned like the new king of heaven.
Found 3 kilometers from where they were last seen, dog was dead and partially blind and apparently there are *17* different dams near and around their house... lucky day lol
i'm so glad a dingo didn't eat another baby
I hope that dog gets a medal and a goddammed military burial. Heroes deserve to be remembered. 

Also, we don't deserve doggos. 

Who the fuck is cutting onions in here?!
And this is why I’ll always have a dog. Fuck cats. My cat woulda ate me.
Only hung around to feast on her carcass.
16 hours isnt long enough for this to deserve a headline
How do we know the dog was by her side the whole time if the girl was lost... How do we know the dog didn't find her 10 minutes before everyone else did...?
'Doggo freezing it's ass off stays next to the only heat source for miles instead of going for help'
Queensland Police released a photo of Max, which has been liked on Facebook more than 11,000 times in one hour.

Is it just me?? This type of facebook likes bullshit make me sick. Who gives a fuck how many people "liked" the fucking picture. The girl is safe quit fucking patting yourself on the back for posting a fucking photo it. OMG DID YOU SEE WHAT WE DID! didn't find the fucking girl...but we did post a fucking picture that got this 👍✌👆many likes on it.
no baby for you, dingos!
There's a housing project called The Elements.  Sounds like they were found there.
So I guess in 16 hours he never figured out what "go get help" meant.
He's deaf and partially blind, so he probably thought he was doing better by staying with her. And he was probably right! :D
Must have been missing his woof to English translator 
I have read this story on three different subreddits so far today and every time it makes me just *so fucking happy*.

What the hell did humans ever do so right to deserve dogs? 
So how did a 3 year old manage to get lost?
Cool story but.. just about every dog would stay with it's human. That part certainly isn't shocking.
There ain't a lot of 'feel good stories' around these days, let it go 👍🏼😍
woulda been funnier if they were just looking for the dog and the baby led them to the dog and the b..


ok well just imagine this same story but baby and dog switch places.
They should ban owning that much land. What would one family need that much land for anyway. They obviously own it just to lose people.
[deleted]
This is in Australia, the kid is three years old.
it was 15c/59F & raining in Warwick last night, so yeah, not Antarctica but a bloody good risk of hypothermia
Awesome story and glad she’s safe, but who names their kid Aurora? 
Disney kings
What pet WOULDN'T do that? It's a domesticated animal, doesn't know how to hunt or survive by itself,  and was probably more scared than the 3-year-old. Why would the pet leave it's only known source of security (a human)? 

Pointless, stupid story. 
Such relentless logic makes you a fun addition to any party no doubt 
But still pretty good
My Max is 11 and still seeing and hearing, but has about a dozen cysts all over his body. Doesn't seem to be slowing him down, and the vet says it is no big deal, but I'm like fml everyday.
And deaf! Good boy. Deserves unlimited treats. Dogs are the fucking greatest 
I put down my blue heeler last month. He was blind, diabetic, and riddled with cancer at 15. We found the tumors too late and couldn’t do anything. They said he was going to last maybe a month. Two years later we had to put him down because it finally caught up with him. They just don’t give up, no matter what when it comes to their family. They are protective as hell of the little ones as well. 
Get that dog a beer! 
Sad that the girl may not remember her savior when she grows up. I hope her parents tell her the story of her big brother doggo.
Sight and sound are transient environmental features. Meaning if you don't see or hear something when it happens it's gone. Luckily mammals, specifically canines have better olfactory systems. So while being unable to see I still have more faith in a dogs ability to smell then some people with perfect vision. What a damn good boy.
And still performed as one of the goodest doggos in the world! Good boy! 
"I'm to old for this shit" 
That dog is a goddamned paladin!
No, a paladin would've bubble hearthed at the first sign of trouble.
Or to mention this was Australia- a dangerous place for a 3yr old to spend a cold night in deep brush.
The dog was deaf too. 
Still my prime suspect if I were lead detective. 
And deaf
And deaf.
And deaf
[deleted]
Dogs live in a world of scent that we can't even really imagine. I bet Max could have found his way home easily.
Guaranteed. Max knew how to get home.

> Dogs live in a world of scent that we can't even really imagine. 

Dogs can also sense earth's magnetic field, which gives them yet another one-up on us humans for navigating.
I’m sure you’ve heard stories of animals finding their way home from hundreds of miles away right? That is all on sense not seeing.  
Our cat years ago traveled more than 15 miles back to our old house. 
He was deaf, but only partially blind and still had his nose. He very likely could have found his way home. 
My parents Pomeranian/Rat Terrier is mostly deaf, going blind, 14, acts like moving is the biggest trouble in the world, but will still push chairs around to jump on the table or knock over the trash can when she thinks no one is around. If that dog wanted to leave it would have. It chose to stay with the girl. 
Also isn't staying with a child just pretty good in itself? I think I remember one of these stories about the dog keeping a little one who was lost warm throughout the night. Not to mention the benefits of emotional support to help stave off some trauma.
>For one thing, they possess up to 300 million olfactory receptors in their noses, compared to about 6 million in us. And the part of a dog's brain that is devoted to analyzing smells is, proportionally speaking, 40 times greater than ours. Dogs' noses also function quite differently than our own.

From [Nova](http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/nature/dogs-sense-of-smell.html). Just FYI!
Wait when was this?  What part of HK too?
"With the power of Pokémon, you can go anywhere!"
I think your brother was the main character of a Studio Ghibli movie. 
Do you know what breed of dog? 
All blue heelers are loyal to a fault.  Like they take normal dog loyalty and crank it up to 11.  [I miss mine.](https://imgur.com/a/JCJRV)  I lost her about 4 years ago.
Yeah, my heeler mix gets a lot of separation anxiety and he is also super protective.  He’s on prozac, which helps a bit. The only place he doesn’t willingly follow me is into the car, because he gets motion sickness, so I have to pick up his wimpy ass and plop him in for short trips to the dog park or vet.  Oddly enough, he is much less protective of me after being in the car.  I don’t know if he’s just mad at me for putting him in there, or if he is so relieved to get out that his anxiety temporarily subsides.  For this reason, I always drive to the dog park, rather than walk, because he can then play with other dogs and people without getting snippy at somebody for getting too close to me.  He’s like a totally different dog, post car ride.
I have one, too. They're known as velcro dogs for a reason. I mean, do any of us with an Australian Cattle Dog ever get to use the restroom alone? Nope. 
My blue heeler had severe separation anxiety
Have one, too. They are derived from Australian Cattle Dogs. Energy for years. love forever.
I had a heeler x who was and always will be my best friend because of his loyalty. He was with me through my late teens and twenties which were some tough times in my life. He was always there to nudge my hand onto his head and let me know he was there for me. 

When I was sick with meningitis he didn't leave my side for 6 weeks. I sneezed once and it hurt so much I fell to the ground and vomited and he just laid next to me licking the side of my head until I could get up.

If anyone acted aggressively towards me he'd very clearly make it known that was a bad idea.

When I lived at home he'd make sure that he spent time with everyone in the house during the night. He'd start in my bedroom until I fell asleep, then my little brother's and he'd always end up in my mom's. 

He lived 13 years, has been gone for about 6 now and I still get emotional thinking about him. He was the best boy.

I've got an amazing Doberman rotty x now. She's a trained s&r dog and exemplifies the doby loyalty you hear about but it's not the same.
My heeler doesn't give a single shit lmao
Blue Heeler was my guess but I also would guess Australian Shepard since they're on a farm in Australia and they look awfully similar to a blue heeler/texas heeler.
I have an Australian Shepard mix. Shepards are die hard loyal dogs. :)
That's an Aussie cattle dog.
Same thing 
A blue heeler tore into my 3 year old niece.
Paw Patrol, Paw Patrol
We'll be there on the double
I'm pretty sure doggos are plenty smart enough to realize that children are puppies and shouldn't be alone.

That's probably why he went with her
The dog must have been so stressed out the whole time.
Now sit right back and you'll hear a tale....
All of that and they're still asking him who the good boy is 
But then she was only 3 meters away from where she was last seen?!?!?! No one tried looking in the place you should start looking until 16 hours of helicopter searching?!? Seems like doggo was the only one who kept his wits.
Poor doggo....  forget about the 3year old kid amirite....
Not a good boy.  

The best boy.  
Trick question, they’re all good.

This is an exceptional boye 
The dog is a better parent them the child's parents.   

Who lets a three year old go walkabout alone in the Australian bush?
It's a shackle and bolt. He's probably wearing a bit of chain as a makeshift collar. 
It's a D\-Shackle \- some people \(particularly farmers\) will use them on collars. It's a lot more secure than a clip if you want to secure your dog to a stake out line or in the back of a ute \(pick\-up truck\)
Shackle, he's a farm dog. Pet store collars and clips don't last long on a farm. 
It locks in the goodness
Would it be too much to ask if the reporter to include the overnight night temp and weather conditions? 
I was thinking rescuers down under, since it’s down under. No mice though... 
Movie made me terrified of porcupines 
Fuck! I almost forgot about that scene. Now the personal waterworks are going. 
Not uncommon here - and neither are droughts. We take the water we can get. 
It's from Australia so they don't use darn
17 near the property. Probably a fairly large farm.
Damn, that's a lot of dams.
That place is seriously dammed.
My dog would stay with me until the end. 
And then probably eat me. 
Good girl. 
I have a border collie. It's nice that I don't have to constantly watch her. Sure, she'll take a walk when camping but she'll come back anyway.

I live on the inside of a block(which is rare here in Belgium hence why I mentioned it as if it's was something special before I realized that's common in the US :p) and she often goes for a walk by herself. Leaves on one side, stays on the pavement and comes back the other.
Then vomit you up on the carpet. 
Try not being corrupt and evil as an adult ;)
I had the stomach flu and slept on the bathroom floor. My dog slept outside the door all night and anytime I woke up to puke, he stood up and didn’t go back to sleep until I did. He was very worried. 
Be the person your dog thinks you are. 
First off how dare you, my dogs hype fest when I get home helps my depression immensely
Agreed 100%

Not to get to much into my personal life or make anyone sad/cringe but a few years ago my S.O. had an encounter with a home intruder while I was at work. It could have been a lot worse but let's just say before he could do anything of real consequence to her, our dog was barking crazy at him she said and bit the shit out his leg to get him off her and he ran away. I will forever love this dog more than most people because she did what I couldn't when I wasn't around. Makes me kind of tear up writing about it, not because I'm sad but because I thank God that she was there and saved my S.O. from situation that no woman should ever have to be subjected to.

Edit: someone requested pics, so here's the good girl.

Oso https://imgur.com/gallery/AVauQBM
I make sure I deserve my dog. Sorry you think you're so horrible...
Speak for yourself, Damien.

I really don't like this meme, or whatever you want to call it. We created dogs. Like literally, we shaped their evolution tens of thousands of years ago. They helped us and we helped them, and in turn we brought them into our own pack literally and figuratively. As any good symbiotic relationship, it's not that we don't deserve dogs. We deserve each other. It's why we act with such anger when someone abuses a dog; it's a violation of our longest outstanding social contract as humans.
Bro... You need to work on some stuff.
r/circlejerk
What a dink. People purposefully domesticated dogs to behave this way, so of course people deserve dogs who act like this.
Not being funny but if I was trapped outside with a mate and we had no means of getting home... I'm pretty sure I'd wait with him for less than one full day before I ran off. 
Makes me think of the Bill Burr bit with Hitler's dog.
Maybe you just don't deserve them. Me and my pup well be happy on our own. 
Isle of Dogs.
Cats, where you at?  DOGS! DOGS! DOGS! DOGS!
I thought this in my early adulthood, now over my mid thirties the opposite is the reality. 

Kids are more evil than adults, or people are individually evil or just meek.  It's even purely circumstantial like someone being in a shitty frame of mind/environment. 

My dog would. Hes a good boy, just not a very smart boy.
I love my dog but I'm 90% sure he'd leave me if push came to shove. 
You know those fun videos where the owner pretends to faint to see what the dog does? Yeah, mine is one of those that would just keep walking. He loves us but loves using his nose more
My dog would chase the first animal or insect she'd see  until she loses track of it and chases another one. There's no way she'd listen to me, way too stubborn. 
My dog loves to bolt the minute she sees another dog/a cat/squirrel/pigeon, I've learnt to carry on walking and ignore her and eventually she gets all scared and runs back to me. Chasing after her only makes her think I'm joining in, then she goes even more nuts lol.
Not to mention the dog was partially blind/deaf. Probably brought him more comfort than the little girl.
I have two greyhounds and one time on a walk another dog ran up to us, my dogs darted behind me almost wrapping each leash around my legs and tried using me as a shield against the other dog....
A dog who likes to explore, mine would probably wander off even though she loves me.
If my dog didn’t have a leash, the second he sees a squirrel or something move, he’d bolt
Max was with her. It's in the article. 
When I was 2-3 I wandered across the road by my house into the woods. My dog kept circling me and that's how my brother found me. 
Allowed? They didn't just send her off to go play. She snuck out.
You must not have much experience with toddlers. 
The fact that it was 5 PM before search and rescue was found, will probably remind a lot of us from the 60/70/80's that she was *just three years old*.

Okay, fast-forward to being 10 years old, the streetlights are already on, but your parents weren't going to go out looking for you with a flashlight and a belt until you were well past due to come home from a roam 'til about 10 PM.

For everything else, they attached a dog to you for a good reason.

Potentially one of those families that are still around.  Particularly farther from modern society one gets.
Little kids will do that man. 
Read the damn article and find out
She went to buy some durries from the servo with her deaf and partially blind dog.
I thought she went for a smoke-o with some bikies!🤤
You don't need to supervise a kid 24/7. That's raising a generation of unable and narcissistic kids in America.

Visit letgrow.org for more info about this topic.
Unfortunately, they copied it straight from the article. I guess “journalists” *and* their “editors” are reading at an eighth-grade level these days.
We have a Beagle as well.  Yup,  that nose shorts out the brain, lol. Also,  if someone were attacking she would either hide behind me or lick them to death.  Guard dogs they are not
Out in the wilderness with no shelter
It means being outside with no shelter, being subjected to whatever weather is happening.
Be careful soldier, proceed with caution
Cat would be back at home making a drink and ordering pizza by Minute 5. :D

A cat would 100% stick by you so it has something to eat after you died.
Not every cat, no.

When I was younger, I fell from a barn loft and landed on cement about 10ft down. Severe concussion, bleeding from my mouth, ears and nose. Fucked up my collarbone, my knees were damaged and they said I was unconscious when found. One of the barn cats (Junior) went out to find my mom and meowed and yowled like he was dying and that's how they found me, because the cat I grew up with had a fit and Lassie'd my mom out.
But the outcome would have been the same, or better since they would have noticed she was missing earlier.
Clint Eastwoof
> Then the grandmother finds them? A huge search party and the grandma is the one to find them, hmmmm.

Not surprising, really.  Family members would be the most familiar with the places the girl was likely to wander off to.  Also, the girl might have been too frightened to respond to searcher's calls, but would have responded her grandmother's voice.  Lastly, the dog came out to take the grandmother straight to the girl's location; the dog probably would have stayed with the girl, protecting her, if it sensed unfamiliar people around.
I’ve seen a dog missing one leg and a missing eye in Mexico about 12 miles away from any town. He was chillin out relaxin all cool 
Even deaf and partially blind I bet that dog could have found his way home. He stayed with the girl despite his own best interests.
I can't wait for the lifetime channel TV movie
Your wife probably should leave you if you submit her to assault, battery, kidnapping, and psychological abuse.

Your dog should, too, it’s just too stupid to figure it out after one go.
Not just good. The BEST. 
Yeah, still good.
Goodest doggo! 🤗
My mom's dog had a scare, and after that we had her for several more months. I gave her hugs and kisses every day I saw her. After she passed, I found this quote by Dean Koontz which sums it up perfectly:

>Dogs lives are short, too short, but you know that going in. You know the pain is coming, you're going to lose a dog, and there's going to be great anguish, so you live fully in the moment with her, never fail to share her joy or delight in her innocence, because you can't support the illusion that a dog can be your lifelong companion. There's such beauty in the hard honesty of that, in accepting and giving love while always aware that it comes with an unbearable price. 

edited for spelling
My hound is 14 and has had those cysts for 3 or 4 years. Just keep an eye on them and keep them clean so they don't get infected and they are fine. 
My dog developed a cyst on his upper leg at around the same age. Totally didn’t bother him. When it got large enough to interfere with his walking I had it removed. The happy ending is that he’s now 15 and still in good health, deaf as a post but no new cysts, so it’s not necessarily an indicator of failing health!
My cat was barely a year old when they told me he probably wouldn't see his second birthday.  It was incredibly hard grieving at first but I decided if he only had another year with me, it was going to be the best year any cat had ever had.  I showered that boy with love and affection and in the end, we got an extra year. 

I know it's hard but think of it this way, you know that he is loved and you get to show him how loved he is every day and make sure his little doggy life is awesome.

That said, anticipatory grief is a real thing and it's an absolute bitch. I'm very sorry you're living with it now.
Pretty sure my old dog's cysts were cancer. 9 years is too short. Q.Q
Just give the dog as much love as possible every day. Give it the best rest of its life you can. That’s the best we can do. 
Cysts really aren’t a big deal. I’ve had dozens of dogs and for some reason they tend to develop a lot more fatty lumps than us. I wouldn’t worry too much about it, and the only time I knew something wasn’t right was when my dog’s head literally doubled in size on his right side. 

It wasn’t soft like those fatty lumps, it was HARD! It felt like an extension of his jawbone, and it was stunning how massive it got. My vet kept denying it saying that it was just a swollen lymph node, and well my parents finally had enough of it and they took my dog to an x-ray specialist. My mom came home that day bawling her eyes. 

She told me that the specialist had said, “honestly if I was in his situation I would buy all the cigarettes, and weed in the world. I would go on a cruise, and I would just drink myself to death.” So, yeah, I wouldn’t worry about it unless they get something extremely hard that feels like bone. 
My Max is 14 and sleeps all day. I'm getting worried about him.
Helen K9ller
Not sure what part of Hong Kong. It was on my grandmothers farm though. This was back before I was born, so ‘78 to lower ‘80’s if I had to guess. 
Even brought his starter with him in case he encountered any Pokémon hiding in tall grass. 
I have a shiba/blue heeler/carolina dog mix. It's the weirdest mix of loyal little asshole and holy shit I love him. 
P L U M P B O Y E

he looked beautiful and I'm sure he can't wait to see you again :)
The sunrise wake up call. My dog does this. Drives me crazy. 
Most dogs only go up to ten, but this one goes up to eleven.
The most loyal dog i have ever owned is my Pembroke Welsh Corgi. He is also too smart for his own good. The only exception is he is definitely a "One Owner" kind of dog. Don't get me wrong, he is fantastic with my kids, but he has no interest in listening to whatever my wife has to say.
That’s a cute dog.
I lost mine two years ago :’( Got her name tattooed a month later. 
My roommate senior year of college had an ACD mix, did the same exact stuff as your pup every morning, truly the goodest boys and girls. 
That's a million dollar smile if I've ever seen one. I'm sorry for your loss. 
Gypsy is beautiful.
Aww she is the cutest and looks like such a good girl. I love her! Rest in love sweet doggo! Thank you for sharing.
Oh man, [my girl](https://i.imgur.com/wPGQy09.jpg) has turned into an overly-clingy old lady. By which I mean, my husband can't always sit next to me on the couch or be within snuggle range on the bed because she loses her damn mind. She's up my ass 24/7. She's my baby but omfg.

To the article, I saw this headline earlier and was pretty much like "well, duh. Blind? Deaf? Geriatric? What does that mean to a cattle dog? NOTHING."
Pic 7 be like “draw me like one of your French girls.”
Wow that's a really beautiful dog.. I'm glad you got to experience your time with her. She looks like she had a really great personality in those pictures.
Sorry for your lost. Great pictures.. She was beautiful
Thanks for sharing those photos
No kidding.  Our female blue won’t even spend any time in the backyard without us.  Barks at the door frantically immediately after peeing or pooping. 

We also have a red male.  Here they are:
https://imgur.com/oybFceG
https://i.imgur.com/2yNAk8W
Yep.  I lived on a 25 acre farm so I could let her outside even though the yard wasn't fenced in.  I knew she wouldn't go far.  However, when she got older she liked to lay in the sun on the back sidewalk.
Those rubber chuck-it balls were the only thing that could withstand the destructive force of Gypsy.  She even managed to rip apart one of those Kong frisbees.  Stuffed animals usually last minutes, but she did have one that was her baby.  She slept with it.  When I would wash it she would look at the washer an whine.  She's still sleeping with it by her side today [under a big hickory tree on my family's farm.](https://imgur.com/FqaePQM)  Dang.  Now I'm crying.
Oh man my heeler mix loves the car. Soon as the trunk door lifts (it's a hatchback) she IMMEDIATELY jumps in as soon as the gap is wide enough. 

One time I popped the hood and she jumped onto the engine.
That's really funny. It almost seems like that puts him in a "going out" mode instead of a "den" mode where he feels he needs to protect you.
you can get doggo prozac?
[My ACD](https://imgur.com/a/Y8C8W) is terrified of the car. My short-term plan is to take him on brief trips to really interesting places. I hope that it works because my other one, the ACD mix, looooves to go for a ride. 
There's nothing worse than a slobbery tennis ball dropped into your undies as you sit on the toilet with your pants around your ankles.  I had lever-style doorknobs, and like the raptors in Jurassic Park, Gypsy figured out how to open doors.
Mine doesn't come into the restroom with me, and if for some reason she does, she always looks away politely so she doesn't stare while you're peeing.
I have two Aussie pure breds; insanely smart and the definition of velcro. They won't leave mine or my wife's side unless directed to and even still, they are within ten feet. They are so insanely attached an intelligent that I can walk them without leashes.
Hey man, you take him out for a pee or poo, so only fair he gets to watch you.
Holy shit, do they all have this? I'd thought that mine must have been abused before I got him.
They ARE Australian Cattle Dogs. Alternate names are Blue or Red Heeler or Queensland Heeler or, jokingly, purple heeler as mine has each a red and blue parent.

Edit: You nailed it with "love forever". Fixed link. 

Interested parties should head over to r/AustralianCattleDog!
Paw Patrol. Paw Patrol. Whenever You're in trouble.
Just yelp for help!
Is that part of the Pawlice?
That looks like a blue heeler in which case he would have wanted to keep track of his flock. 
I imagine it would depend on the doggo. In the same way that there are stupid humans, there are stupid doggos.
I believe doggos think children are puppies too!

My doggy Dixie treated my nieces and nephew like they were her puppies. She would scold them with boowoowoo sounding barks and would pin them down to clean their faces and hands if they were dirty, not just food dirty, but dirt dirty. She tried to clean their hair too. God I miss that pup! She had to be put down a little over a year ago and she was one amazing floof. 

Dogs are truly wonderful!
Mine isnt... 
They see children as young members of the pack.

The story makes it sound like the girl was taking the dog for a walk on her own. It is Australia...
Maybe hungry and thirsty, though many dogs are only fed once a day. It was probably just fine as long as it was with family (the girl). I would have been more surprised if the dog abandoned her. 
Why would a dog sitting with it's family in the woods be stressed? Dogs are not people. Sitting in the woods is a pretty normal thing for them
Not the best boy.

The bestest boy.
Eh. I didn't see him set up a single light.
They're good dogs Brent 
I don't know. In my experience the dog's "goodness" is directly proportional to their size.
They’re all good ? That’s like saying all humans are good.  
All good dogs. All pure. I don’t make the rules, that’s just how it it. 
Except my neighbors dog.  Fuck that piece of shit.
[deleted]
> They aren't inherently bad, they just learned to be bad. Even bad dogs would have been good dogs with better owners.

So then, they _can_ be bad?
Idk define *bad*. Is a bad dog one who barks a lot? Is that really it's fault? Does that really make it bad?

Or if it pees and poops in the house? Again is that its fault? Does that make the dog bad?

I guess Cujo could be considered a bad dog, but he had fucking rabies so rabies makes dogs bad I guess but that hardly counts. Unless a person traisn a dog to hurt people or a dog gets rabies, I'm gonna say they are all good
Bad people are usually a product of their environment. Even if they suffer from psychological problems or mental illness those can usually be addressed with a combination of therapy and drugs. In serious cases they can be addressed with hospitalization. I'd say at least 80% of prisoners wouldn't be there given the right circumstances and opportunity like basic income and social outreach programs. The US has the highest prison population per capita in the world and it's because it's easier to blame individuals rather than fix a broken justice system.
way to politicize it but i agree. 
We need to politicize more, politics being taboo is part of what got us into this mess.
But my feely feels!
Don’t take this away from me. Nothing is perfect but I can damn well pretend
They're good dogs, bront
There are no bad dogs... just bad owners
Then there are no bad guns just bad owners.  Yea? 
A gun is a device that has one purpose: kill it's target. 
A dog's sole purpose is to love
Some people see it that way
Seems like she wandered out 
I mean that was my main reaction to this story. Maybe keep a better eye on your kids.
> or in the back of a ute (pick-up truck)

Side note - don't tie your dog to the bed of your pickup while driving. Let them ride in the cab, or let them ride in the bed under a topper.

Chaining your dog to the truck is a good way to kill them in the event of an accident.
> Ute

Seems Aussies and New Zelanders have expanded the term a bit so that a ute term applies to more than the modern descendants of an El Camino. ;)
Thanks, this is response I was looking for. So the dams help store water when it rains and is used later during droughts?
I just have a question, Is this a god damn?
In the video they said it’s a 10 acre property. 

Edited because its not a 10 square mile property. 
All must serve the cycle 
I'll Try. Sigh..
Some adults are good! You guys should see /r/wholesomememes

Nice mentality.
He’s just guilty about all the masturbation
Seriously... What world does this weirdo live in?
“Oh, you want to use my cell phone, complete stranger with tattoos? Sure!”
No! Mind your own business!
Awww I would've left the bathroom door open and slept with him.
Best piece of advice ever! 
Don't worry, they're just repeating a stupid circlejerky saying that they heard on /r/aww. You deserve your pup's love just as much as everyone else <3
I’m in the living room reading this and my dogs in my bed sleeping...im going to go hug her now. 
Damn good dog. Not a dog person but this is what I love about them, companion to the end. Give her a snack 
What is she? Looks just like my roommates dog but we have no idea what she is 
Best doggie ♥️
> Not to get to much into my personal life or make anyone sad/cringe

No this is a good story. Cringe is overused. Never apologize for a generic writing making someone cringe/sad/angry/homicidal/fat/etc. That's on them, just like its on them for sounding 12 when they comment with cringe. Those comments help you realize you are above them.

cheers!
Good pup. Very good.
That edit is a lie or else I just can't see link on mobile. 
Oh sorry I didn't repaste the link, my bad. It's few comments down in this chain though too. Re-editing lol sorry bro

Edit: or bro-ette
Yay, hero dog!

Thanks, bro/bro-ette
Check out the documentary "the science of dogs" pretty interesting and IIRC they talk a bit about dog eugenics 
Yet dogs are abused, neglected, cooked, skinned, etc. worldwide by the hundreds of thousands yearly. 
We instilled genetic Stockholm syndrome into dogs and we deserve dogs for that? 

You’ve got a weird way with logic. 
It makes me cringe every fucking time. Of course we deserve dogs, we evolved together and trained them to hunt and live alongside us. We made them who they are and to a certain extent, they've made us who we are. Also, I'm sick of people on Reddit acting like animals are better than humans and more deserving of love. Just look at the negative comments when someone posts a picture of their kid on /r/aww, it's pathetic. It's not even against the rules to post humans in that sub, some people are just hateful against their own species I suppose.
The highest form of it. Everyone is so sick of it that even people on pet subs are calling it out now...  
Lol I always thought this whenever that is said. Like we literally cultivated dogs over thousands of years to become our companions, you're goddamn right we deserve this bond with these animals because we're the reason their even is one 
People also bred certain dogs to be  horribly disfigured for the sake of cuteness.
Wasn't that a Norm Macdonald bit? Could be wrong a lot of people talk about dogs and Hitler.
Maybe he is a smart boy and wants you to follow him.
"human looking very hungry...time to go good luck."
He knows the way home
Honestly it was 16 hours. That's not actually that long. 
It's a long time when you're cold and alone without any food or shelter. 
16 hours is a long time in extreme conditions 
Beagle owner here. As loyal and clingy as he is, when I've tried this and had the same result as you, I convince myself he knows I'm just pretending and can sense I'm not in any real danger. 
The kid told her mother she was going out looking for the dog. I'm not sure who comforted whom more. And other news reports say the kid was heard before the dog was found and led the way.

Still, both kid and dog are fine so all's well that ends well.
I think that paragraph meant the little girl was looking for her mother when she wandered off with her dog (though some sources say the dog followed her).

Also according to other articles, the grandma heard the girl's voice, but when she went to search for her, they found Max first who then led them  to Aurora.
This.

My almost blind and full deaf doggo follows all humans from my family. He touches humans legs with his head just to be sure we're around and near him.

He's one little weirdo but he'd stay with my niece and cuddle with her no matter what.

On the other hand my second dog would do the sane because she is protective. Last year when we me huge, crazy happy dog on a walk she stood between him and my niece and made sure crazy doggo wouldn't bump into little human. She does things like this.

Most of dogs are like that. They're attached to kids in the household and I suspect most of them would stay with their little humans.
Damn I missed that part. Lucky he wasn't deaf or blind
The article, though poorly written, says she told her mom she was "looking for her" and then took the dog for a walk. You don't just lose track of a 3 year old for hours. Not even an hour. 
You know what I mean. She was unsupervised either way
You never got lost as a kid? Even in a store. Hell I got myself lost in a Walmart and a festival as a kid. Not my parents fault I decided I wanted to go on an adventure. They wouldn't have been able to stop me if they tried. 
You cant keep your eyes on a toddler 24/7.  Shit happens man.
Truth, them bastards know how to slip away at the drop of a hat.
I have a 4 year and 18month old. They are insane and I've accepted I can't do anything for myself besides make quick meals unless they are both asleep, but they have never just slipped away outside. All my doors have locks out of their reach because I know what they are capable of. There's no excuse for just not paying attention and letting them run off outside unsupervised. That's how kids get lost, kidnapped, or dead. 
she was 3 man very different age gap your story is pretty circlejerk 
https://youtu.be/RRKv1wgcuLk
You got to stay up until 10? Lucky sod.
Sundown was time to go home.

Sunset was the deadline.

10pm is you're gonna get an ass whopping.

The longer you stay out between the last two steps the more trouble you're in. 

3 is a bit young to allow this. This is more 10+
I have 3 kids, iv never lost any of them for hours on end, looks like they let the 3 year old take the dog for a walk by themselves? 3 year olds dont know shit and sure can't wander off on their own. This is 100% on the parents
Yeah I get that. Was just totally dumbfounded that they took so long to notice. If my wife can't find my dog for 10 minutes there's a full blown search party 
> 1b elements plural : weather conditions; especially : violent or severe weather battling the elements

> https://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/element

Is this the meaning? How often is this expression used? You can't use it when/if the weather was nice?
But it was daytime
Rain/snow/wind/thunderstorms/tornadoes/freezing temperatures/etc don't happen during the day? This is news to me. (also, she was out there overnight.)
Never thought about that, if I was still a wee lad I would be too afraid of the police, but if I heard my Grandma, I'd know I'm safe.
Shooting some b-ball outside of the school?
Then he could have also led the grandma to her.
Damn, they don’t have adages where you come from?
Wow. Uhh. Thanks for...explaining the joke I guess...
We have the best pets, dont we folks.
The best, Jerry. The BEST. 
I’m being criticized for me use of the term “ THE BEST” it is a greatly underrated term (and I do mean GREATLY folks) and we should all be using it more often
Are you referring to that comic? It's too early to cry
Who’s Best Boi
Our dogs may not be a "lifelong" companion for us, but we are a lifelong companion for them. All they will know their whole existence is love and companionship. (Omg typos....)
That quote makes me tear up.
Omg......that is making me remember my dog I had for 20 years. I have her ashes to be buried with me one day.  She is a good girl....and waiting so patiently. 
Had to put my dog asleep on Thursday. 

You just know the days coming... :(

I just wish my other dog knew her older bro isn't coming back home.

edit... aaaaaaand I'm crying again
Nice reminder to put my tablet down and roll over to give Waggerwitz a hug and smootch, even though she smells like she rolled in goose poop and gf would probably complain about her up here after we just changed the bedding.
Dogs teach you how to love unconditionally but they also teach you how to move on. 
I once sent Dean Koontz a fan letter when I was a preteen and I started receiving his newsletters after that. They usually had photos of his dogs, talked endlessly about them. 
I liked getting those newsletters throughout high school, but then I moved to college and my mom moved out of our apartment and I stopped getting them. 
I'm gonna snuggle my dog now
There's a quote in my "German Shepherds for dummies" that goes something along lines of "Better to have a memory worth mourning than to have never had the memory at all".
[Beau](https://youtu.be/mwGnCIdHQH0) 
“People are born so that they can learn how to live a good life – like loving everybody all the time and being nice, right?” 

The four year old continued, “Well, dogs already know how to do that, so they don’t have to stay as long.”
Also sad knowing that one day, one of your dogs will outlive you. And they most likely won't understand...
Folks dog is a golden lab, had a cyst cut off a few months ago. She's nearly 16 and still great, going deaf but still happy.
Aww that is so sad. Cats are so underappreciated. I have both dogs and cats and I love them both to death. People don’t appreciate cats because they don’t bother to train them, but whenever those people come to my house they are amazed, “your cats are just as well behaved as your dogs!”

And they are thenceforth converted into cat lovers. It always warms my heart to see people who already love and own cats. Why did it die so young? I’m glad that you at least gave it a wonderful last year. Not all cats get that. 
Damn.  It’s weird talking to actual HK natives not immigrants or children of immigrants, etc.  I didn’t know there were many farms here anyways I though it was mostly city work and fishing
You're going to need to share some pictures!
Mine is a Lab/Heeler/Rott mix. He's ridiculously loyal and territorial to a fault.
Pictures please, I'm so curious as to what that mix looks like. 
Mine's a heeler/corgi mix. He's colored like a Lancashire heeler but he's taller than they are so it's weird.
PET TAX PET TAX PET TAX 

But seriously, what does that mix even look like?  Please deliver, OP!
She put on a bit of weight when she got older, but she was still as strong as an ox.  They are built like tanks.  I've seen my neighbor's fall off of a hay wagon onto pavement back first, get up, and shake it off like nothing happened.  Gypsy once ripped off a toenail while playing fetch.  The nail was just hanging by a thread.  She buried her head in my armpit and wimpered while I did surgery with my pocket knife.  30 seconds later she was ready to play again.
The alarm is going off in five minutes?  I'd better get in position!
If u. Learn how to take care of then 10 is kinda young..  little last usually around 16 to 18 and bigger ones 12 and up... But know it takes proper care and exercise
That's one more.
My corg/Aussie is a one owner dog as well. I hate to admit it but it's true, she doesn't obey my girlfriend nearly as well.
Got a border collie and a blueheeler/corgi mix, they love us with ferocity but that corgi is 6 months old and the most stubborn damn dog i have ever met. Dude is so cute though, makes up for the pain in my ass.
Be prepared for a lifetime of stubborness. My Corgi will refuse to come inside by sitting on top of my daughters jungle gym. Thats his "I'm not coming in" perch.
Yeah, he will be territorial and protective if I walk with him anywhere, but I can drive him to a place that is easily within walking distance, and the “teleportation” in the car seems to fix that.
Yup!  Same as human Prozac.
I'm now so thankful that my doors have knobs! 

[Whilst trying to bathe](https://i.imgur.com/fkNWLip.jpg)...
Same. If recall works even when there's a squirrel present (human, look, A SQUIRREL!!!), you know that bond is strong. The only thing that he might love more? [Ball](https://i.imgur.com/acjtY6b.gif) (cattledog.exe has stopped working) or [Frisbee](http://i.imgur.com/LucNE0qh.gif). 
We got her from 1 year old and she was babies the whole time. Crying when leaving and coming home.
No job too big!
I always change this lyric to “one of thems name is Rubble” just to change it up when I can’t get it out of me head.   
Creature Report!
One flocky boi
I have one of each. One very smart dog who would happily stick by his hooman child through a blizzard, and one very, very stupid dog who would forget who his hooman child was in 3 minutes flat, then proceed to chase his tail until he fell down. 
But they're all good doggos.
Yeahhh my dog would have headed for home within an hour with or without the kid. He’s not a fan of our kids :/
idk as a human it's a choice that you actively make, you're an asshole but you could decide not to be an asshple. I doubt doggos can make that choice consiously.
I have a very smart pug. I have a very dumb pekingese. Like... the dumb one gets lost in the front yard. He doesn't get the leash and it scares him. The flowers confuse him. He gets trapped behind the couch. He looks constantly confused. Someone could steal him and he wouldn't even realize he was with new people or in a new house. He has no concept of what is going on at any time. I love him. Don't get me wrong. But we've had him eight years. Come on now. 
If you don't mind me asking, what breed was Dixie? She sounds like she was really lovely. 
My dog treats my toddler like lava. AH, don't let it touch me! But I guess that's how he treats puppies too. 
Yeah, the dog probably didn’t know they were “missing.” He just thought he was on a walk with his young human and they were getting to spend the night outside. He’s old and lives on a 10 acre plot of land. I’d wager he knew right where he was the whole time. 
Not the bestest boy.

A national hero.
my 10 lb pomeranian (who is an ultra good boy) has something to say about this. My 10 lb chihuahua (who is the ultra sweetheart) also does. 
I have a 12 pound chihuahua (that got abandoned during a move) and he’s a good boy. I’ll take a picture for you as proof.

Edit: I don’t want to download the imgur app and deal with that shit to post a picture, I may have to make a post just to create a link 
Well in my experience with owning 4 dogs over 80lbs, the exact opposite is true... Smaller the dog bigger the attitude
“Was be a good dog?”

“Who could
Say?”
Agreed, chihuahuas are the spawn of satan.
Let us not forget Beebee the Maltese.

https://youtu.be/tw9nrHA-JyU
Yeah, I was following a car one day when a dog tied in a truck bed jumped out. It was one of the most horrific things I had ever seen. Luckily the guy stopped and I think the dog was okay, but I’ll never forget that scene. Poor doggo.
Yup. Had one day last year at our ER where a poor dog came in with major degloving issues after he jumped out of the truck bed but was tied to his leash, and got drug an estimated fifty feet down the road or so before the owners noticed and stopped. Thankfully, last I heard he's doing fine now, but that's after plenty of surgery and months on months of recovery. Don't tie your dogs to a moving platform, people.
This is true. I had a retarded German shepherd who broke the chain that was locked to the bed of the truck in the middle of the highway because he saw a squirrel... he ended up under the rear wheels of the truck but he chased that squirrel after getting run over like nothing happened. Absolutely insane doggo
My Lena girl lost her front leg cause she fell out the back of a moving truck when she was a puppy before we got her! I now have a fear of other dogs falling out of trucks when I see them in the bed. 
Vet here - if you do chain your dog to the back, make sure it is SHORT so they dog cannot jump/fall off the truck.
Shit, even then dogs can have dumb moments. My buddies dog jumped THROUGH the window of his truck once, no idea how.
 Note, don't have your dog in the cab with you because in the event of a crash the dog doesn't have a seatbelt and it's flying body can end up killing you. 
My wife witnessed a dog that was chained to the bed of a truck that had jumped out at a stop light. He ran over its legs and immediately got out of his truck, bawling his eyes out.
Fuck that. I'd rather my dog die chained up vs. Flying through the back/front window possibly killing my passenger or sending my dog sailing 50 yards down the street only to die on impact.  

Seriously? Downvotes for valuing my human passengers lives over my dogs?
You can get a harness that attaches to a seatbelt clip in a car. While not practical it is the safest way for a dog to travel.
Be careful with these. There was a study several years ago that found most of these were catastrophically flawed. Some caused more injury to your dog than if they were left free floating. These "seatbelts" for dogs don't/can't operate like the 3 point seat belt that holds you in your seat in an accident.

There may be better ones on the market now, but in general I'd probably avoid them in favor of safer options where they exist.
No kidding. I didn't know that. Thanks for the info
I think that they are really exaggerating how difficult it is to find a safe one and what they are intended for. 



From my understanding, the dog seatbelts you described are meant to keep them from jumping out the windows, causing an accident by distracting the driver, or getting loose during an emergency situation. Most aren’t meant to protect from impact during a collision.



There are a million different kinds now, and I wouldn’t trust a cheap one from Amazon where the instructions are in broken English, but if you want to use one there is a lot of information about the many options online.
In a kennel which is strapped down and out of the way of possible road debris (e.g. inside the back of an SUV) is safest. 
Not as safe because the dog is free to bash itself to death inside the cage during a rollover accident.
If you don't think you can transport your dog safely in your vehicle, maybe you shouldn't be transporting them in that vehicle. You are solely responsible for that dogs safety, and "I would rather my dog die chained up" (vs safer alternatives) is pretty shitty ownership.

Also, your dog us very unlikely to fly through the back window in an accident. That's pretty tough glass, and is situated high. If your dog is flying forwards, it will be into the front of the bed.

Also also, your dog has a _much_ better chance of living if they are ejected from the truck bed vs tied to it. But then again, I also said you should probably have a topper to keep them in the bed in anything but the most serious of accidents.
Or a kennel for travel. Or God forbid spend a little bit of money on your dog for a car harness. 
> for a car harness. 

I hate to be _that_ guy, but those are generally found to be less safe than your dog free-floating in your vehicle.

I would guess that kennel/crate in a vehicle is probably safer, but I haven't heard much about them and how they fair in accidents.
I'm going to get a kennel when I get a dog. I would never get those dog harnesses unless it was the pod contraption thats been crash tested. I won't have a big car but I'll only have one dog so I'll just put it in the backseat. They have kennels that are crash tested! 
Huh, TIL. Good thing I still use the kennel that is buckled in to the car seat as a child seat would be. 
Well proper tanks are a better bet for long term storage, but the damns are pretty useful for short term needs like watering, cleaning, etc. Also takes a bit of the strain from rivers for large scale irrigation. 

Also lots of damns peppering the countryside make our rural Fire brigades job soooo much easier. 
Yes. And other things. Crazy, right? Not just the for eye candy! Those sexy dams...
Master...ation... Masturbation? Oh yeah
This blows dude. Let’s go back. 
>I’ll try 

Username doesn’t check out 

>Sigh..

Okay sorta 
*unzips pants*
Or r/humansbeingbros
It’s a fun one.
As opposed to?
One where they think all the news stories reflect an accurate depiction of the world, despite it being the most peaceful, least violent period in human history. 
It was open, he was just giving me space because hes a very polite doggo. He watched concerned from a distance, but he was still there. 
I spoil her so much now, not that I didn't before but anytime we have anything a dog would never get under normal life circumstances, she always gets some. She really enjoys crab I've found lol.
There is never a bad time to hug your dogs
I'll give her a treat just for you. :]
I don't trust people that aren't dog people.
Wait until your SO is attacked by a dog and then talk to me.
That does suck, and it sucks that that ruined dogs for you :(


Yep, thanks. It was horrible. Her lip was almost torn off, the surgeon did an amazing job.  It brought us closer together, silver lining if you will. 
We were told she was an Australian Shepard mix of some sort, and other dog owners haven't seemed to argue it and agree. So I'm inclined to believe that's the case but honestly don't know.
People everywhere are evil. Maybe evil people don't deserve dogs. The saying is *we* don't deserve dogs. 
A friend of mine was bitten on the face by a dog as a child, serious enough to still leave scars after plastic surgery. Dogs can be great and heroic and whatnot, but they can also be terrible and violent. I know that's probably an extreme minority of cases and I feel a bit bad being so negative, but I always think of it when I see comments like the one above. 
Because humans suck. 

How many dogs have gaslighted you for years about your relationship with them? How many dogs employ hierarchies based on race and breed and systematically abuse and kill other dogs because of it? How many dogs use the gift of intelligence they were given to blow up and subjugate the world instead of trying to make it better? 

Or, tl:dr: how many dogs have invented an atom bomb? 

Humans don’t deserve anything because we’re too busy already wondering how to appropriate it and feel even more power from it. 
Literally all those points you made are impossible for a dog to do because its outside their own scope of reality. For all we know humans could be the kindest intelligent species in the universe *or* the worst. But either way its stupid to compare humans to animals because its like comparing apples to oranges.
You're the exact type of person I'm talking about. Just stop. It sounds like you have some personal issues to work out, but don't take them out on regular people trying to go through life. You're basically saying: "Well, Hitler and my shitty ex existed, so I don't ever have to give anyone a chance ever again. Humans suck, including me. What a piece of shit I am." Sorry, but grow up. That's such a cop out, it's ridiculous.
You are the exact type of person who makes people prefer animals. Judgmental and intolerant toward other people's views. If somebody prefers animals to humans that is not a personal slight against you and it certainly isn't an example of "taking \[issues\] out on regular people trying to go through life."

A human being has a much more complicated personality that might be competitive, envious, judgmental, awkward, hateful, etc... all things that animals are not really capable of. So there is a valid reason for liking animals more than people. It might not be your preference but get over yourself.
The majority of people on the planet are self centered and greedy  just by human nature.  You don't have to be the next Hitler to be a piece of shit. The majority of the 'regular people trying to go through life' are still harmful to the world.

We are ALL intelligent enough to know better. But we still eat meat, we still buy the new iPhone, we still participate in wars and acts of terrorism and hatefulness, and any time someone is given power they use it greedily or selfishly.

I don't think he's wrong.
I don't think they're taking it out on anyone. They're just sharing facts about humanity.
/s??? Please?? Or are you completely serious
Why would it be sarcasm if it's true? I mean sure there's good in the world too but let's not pretend humanity hasn't been cruel and power crazed throughout history.
I would pretend I was in distress and faint. My dog would just sniff me and lick my face because I assume he knew I was ticklish. Gets me every time.
Yeah, I feel like a pinball wizard would be terrible company in the woods.
There are plenty of old people like that driving around.  Luckily this good boy was walking instead of driving. 
Yeah, super glad he was only mostly blind, and partially deaf.
I can see where it sounds that way from the article, but I think what they meant is when they found the girl later, and asked her what she was doing (why she ran off) she said she was looking for her mom.
My first child was an escape artist by 3 years old.  She learned to open doors early.   Then she learned to break child locks off the knobs, so we installed “hotel locks” up high.   Then she just removed the screen and crawled out the kitchen window.   (Our windows were low to the ground)
toddlers are (borderline) suicidal
My three year old has figured out the dead bolt. He pushed a stool to the door so he could reach.  He thinks the mailman is Santa so he wanted to open the door for him bringing a box to the door.  We had a long talk about that but I’m contemplating a second lock up higher because of it. 
This happened in Toronto last year, a 3 year old snuck out while his parents were asleep and froze to death. 
Was just talking about the age gap in how long kids are allowed to roam.

I think that point was missed.
I left the house once when I was 3. According to my parents I was put down for a nap when my mother went off to use the bathroom I just got out of my crib and went outside for a walk in my pajamas.
You must be childless. 
This is always everyone's response when someone critisizes someone else's parenting. I have two kids and I've never had them disappear for hours without noticing. My one son got lost at a festival for about 20 seconds once, that was the longest I've not been able to locate one of my kids.
You are right these people are dumb as hell, who let's a 3 year old wander off to take a dog for a walk and then doesn't notice they're gone for hours??
You have been fortunate. I would be careful when poking someone else in the eye.  That 20 seconds could have been forever.  
Full disclaimer: I am childless myself. However, I do participate and lead rescue efforts when a little one is missing in our area.  
I haven't just been fortunate, I've been diligent. I take every precaution to make sure my kids are safe at all times. I wish everyone else did the same.
Thank you!! For both your comment and your efforts in locating littles.  
I have a two year old, and so far I have been lucky enough not to lose her, but I have no high horse to ride on. I know how easily it could happen. Kids are surprisingly resourceful and smart when they want something and we all do the best we can!!!
You are welcome. People can be so judgemental. 
Until a couple of guys who were up to no good started making trouble in his neighborhood.
Mr new Orleans here is mad that someone who could make a joke like is married with an awesome wife and dog. And he principal PC is lonely 
They do, but we tend to focus on the ones that don’t advocate domestic abuse. You know, like “a bird in hand is worth two in the bush,” and so on.
Well Mr humor it's a joke on how loyal they are pretty sure nobody's ever fucked there best friend and took half there stuff..... Sorry if I offended you I'll wait 5 min for you to visit your safe place then we can move on
You didn’t offend me, you just aren’t funny and that saying is stupid. Fucking deal with it.
Yes child crying about it while others laughed is.. uu can say you didn't like it but ur two sense is worthless so go cry in your safe place and let me no when your ready to put ur big boy pants on
I didn’t explain the joke. I pointed out that it isn’t funny or worth repeating.
It's not funny to "you". There is an entire universe of people who don't care what you think is funny. Lighten up.

"God is a comedian performing for an audience that doesn't know how to laugh." - Voltaire 
Dog's are truly humanity's best achievement. Fuck the moon
I think our pets would do a better job in Washington than our politicians.

Who wants treats? And sidewalks? Oh good boy.
Everyone's always telling me about how great our pets are.   
If we could not involve President Cheeto in our dog memes, that’d be great.
Yep. I've heard it phrased as, "I may not get to live the rest of my life with her, but at least she gets to live the rest of her life with me."
Every time I have to go through the loss of a beloved pet I'm heartbroken. The pain is almost too much to bear. But then I remembered all of the great things we shared and the love we had for one another. Its absolutely worth going through such a loss to experience such joy.

I can never replace the ones I've lost but I can bring another animal into my life and share it with them for as long as they're around. 
Well, now that we’ve gone down this road, can someone just copy paste the “guarding over my family for generations” one so we can all get a proper cry in and get on with our lives?

Edit: Apparently you are all even lazier than I am. Here you go:


*“Now I am old. The fur around my muzzle is grey and my joints ache when we walk together. Yet she remains unchanged, her hair still glossy, her skin still fresh, her step still sprightly. Time doesn’t touch her and yet I love her still.”*

*“For generations, he has guarded over my family. Since the days of my great-great-great-great-great-grandfather he has kept us safe. For so long we thought him immortal. But now I see differently, for just as my fur grows gray and my joints grow stiff, so too do his. He did not take in my children, but gave them away to his. I will be the last that he cares for. My only hope is that I am able to last until his final moments. The death of one of his kind is so rare. The ending of a life so long is such a tragedy. He has seen so much, he knows so much. I know he takes comfort in my presence. I only wish that I will be able to give him this comfort until the end.”*
#####On Death, Dying, And Other Ways Of Leaving Legacies

At the back of my parents’ garden there is a fence. It has been there since I was a small boy and, seventy-three years later, it still stands to this day. Sure, it has been beaten a little by the wind, there’s dust from over seventy summers crusted across a few planks, but it’s still there more or less, the same fence as when I was a child. When I was young I would play in the garden and kick a ball against it, for hours. The fence seemed indestructible in my youth. I really liked to batter the thing and I cannot emphasise this enough. On occasions, likely more than I’d like to readily admit, I would take the wooden cricket bat out from the tool shed and give the fence a good thwacking until my hands went numb and the pins and needles set in and Mother would shout about the racket I was stirring up with the neighbours. But the fence only shook, never broke, and that’s an idea which stuck in a young boy’s mind all those years ago—take the hit and move on—a powerful thought that serves well to recall in troubling times. 

2017, we buried my Father in the Spring, he was ninety-four years old. He passed away in his sleep, holding the hand of his loving wife for many years, my Mother, who had cared for him until peace.  In his more senior years, Dad struggled with his health and often woke in night, Mother would feel the cooling air slip under the covers as he got up and left the bedroom. Every evening this happened, the next day Mother would find him at the top of the Garden, on his favourite garden chair, swinging back asleep with his weight against the fence.

I went out back and walked along the stone path which snakes its way through Mother’s carnations. I rode a bicycle for the first time on this path, sixty-eight years ago, with Dad behind pushing me along, Mother scolding him as I crashed into the flower beds and he fell to the ground laughing. 

The fence still stood, faded brown now, yet proud in the warm April air. Inside, the din of chatter from the wake had turned to loud laughter and the clinking of glasses, I could hear *House of the Rising Sun* was now playing on the jukebox. In maudlin literature a white dove might fly down and land on my shoulder at this point in the story, and you, as the reader, would infer great meaning from this intrusion. But believe me, though you are within your creative rights to do this, any meaning would be entirely your own and unintended by myself. Instead I walk up to the fence and simply look at one of the planks, I remember the beatings I’d inflicted upon it and how it still stood strong in spite of one child’s senseless vendetta against it. Then I give it a little tap, and the plank crumbles underneath my finger leaving a small hole the size of a penny. 


I’m sitting on the toilet crying now. Thanks. 
Its like Chewy and Han. 
He was diagnosed with an unbelievably rare genetic condition called Feline Restrictive Myofibroblastic Sarcoma.  It's characterised by a thickening and tightening of the tissues in the face, meaning he couldn't shut his eyes all the way, and non-cancerous tumours on his face and mouth.  It's normally found in cats over the age of 10 and he was symptomatic before his 1st birthday.  One in a billion chance basically.

They said it typically kills within 6 months but we had an extra 2 years together after diagnosis.  We put him down last spring when he developed persistent urinary problems and was in and out of the vets for a couple weeks.
Yea my grandmother had a pretty big farm from what I was told. They also had chickens and ducks. My mom told me that the land was bought from my grandmother by the government so it’s no longer there sadly. 
My dad used to talk about his childhood in Hong Kong and I could hardly believe him half the time. When he took me to HK, he'd point to a road that had been paved and told me that there used to be a river there or how a completely flat road used to be a hill.


He lived in Wo Hop Shek, a village near the base of a mountain/hill that was also a cemetery. He and his brothers and friends would climb the area surrounding the mountains, playing in the rivers, fishing in the rivers, and 'stealing' lychee/longan from farms because the tree branches went over the fenced area. 
I agree. Gotta pay that pet tax :D
What an interesting mix. Care to share some pictures?
You’re a good dad
Gypsy has best daddo.
They're mini brick shit-houses. Im in the process of rescuing one. 
I've seen blue heelers get a good kick by a cow and come back mad. 

They're good dogs
ours  separated her knee somehow chasing squirrels and still kept playing.....
Yep.  I know that look well.  I also love the "BRING ALL THE TOYS!!!" strategy.
No pup too small!
Who would win? ALL the elements or one flocky boi?
We had a dog once, that had to be leashed to a post because we had np yard. It had a big enough radis for him to run, but he rightfully hated the thing. 

So he wore it out, he ran, and rubbed it to the right. He ran, and rubbed it to the left. He did so for hours, for days, until friction frayed the hated leash and it snapped. 

And then Blue ran to the right, and to the left, in our yard, dragging the broken leash behind him for the rest of the day.

That dog...stuoid or smart? Truly and enigma.
She was a corgi, beagle, cattle dog mix. She probably had a bunch of other breeds mixed in, but those three really stood out in her appearance and mannerisms. She was absolutely lovely! I found her for free on Craigslist and the home was sketchy. She was about 5 and malnourished with stage 3 periodontal disease. Turns out she was also terribly abused as she would duck and cower away from stick like objects and was terrified of the smell of cigarettes and alcohol breath(family members had these smells). She had quite the life before I got her and I tried to make her life with me happy and spoiled! I loved her so much! 
No doubt. I grew up on a plot of 40 acres. Both my cat and dog spent most of their time outside the house during the day. At night we’d call them a few times by yelling their names and they’d be on the porch within 10 minutes lol. Animals are so weird. 
This. Doggo probably could’ve led girl home if she had just asked. 
I hearby give him the coveted MEDAL OF WOOF
Not a national hero.

A Birdest boy
We have two Westie’s and an Airedale, the little ones weight in around 15-18lbs... anything smaller is just too small for me to get attached to. I’ve seen too many Chihuahuas, Yorkies, and similar with broken legs from being trampled and sat on etc. that they’re just not enough dog for me to be comfortable owning. I watched a 6y/o little not being very lovey to his families Yorktown once(about 1y/o), it was really cute until he decided he was finished and just dropped the dog and broke its leg; sure it wasn’t prepared but it wonky fell like 1’...


Still though, best of luck to you and yours.
My Pomeranian who had a full on fight with a 60 lb huskie mix and came out only a little worse for wear would argue that. 

I take both my dogs on extensive hiking trips through forest and such. Only issue is sometimes picking them up in dense high grasses. 
Lol... I’m sorry but that’s not true. If your ten pound dog got into a fight a real dog fight with a dog six times it’s size it would not be ok. 


Hell, I’m a pretty damn good fighter with pretty solid experience and training, if a 350lb gets ahold of my 185lb ass I’m in deep shit.

I hunt my with my Airedale. He gets put through grueling work exercises depending on what we’re training for; he’s a very versatile working dog. He has more grit than 90% of working dogs I’ve encountered and he weighs in around 65lbs. I’ve seen him spar with young coyotes and I’ve seen him get after big raccoons. I’ve seen him truly work over a few terribly untrained pit bulls, mostly bc he’s experienced with aggressive dogs like coyotes... however, if I see him get into it with a 200lb rottie you bet your ass I’m not gonna expect ‘ol Duke to be on top if I don’t intervene ASAP.

Not saying your dogs don’t have grit, so please don’t take this the wrong way. I just can’t let someone go on about Pomeranian truly holding it’s own in a fight with a dog 6x it’s size, that’s just BS.


What is not true? This is not a debate, or a conceptual argument, it is an event that happened. Your random comment adds nothing. 

Dogs don't fight to kill each other, they fight to assert dominance. Size is only one of MANY factors involved in dominance of dogs. 

Huskie attempted to bit at my dog and knock him over, my dog went apeshit, bit evaded him (easily) and kept biting at his face. Husky backed the fuck down. 

If it was a bloodmatch, yeah, no contest, but a dog is a dog regardless of size. We already know this. 
Ok so not a dogfight then, that’s all I needed.
A dogfight? What country do you think this is? 

Other than animal bloodsports, all dogfights are simply dominant behaviour exhibition. Whenever you see a dog fighting this is explicitly why. 

Your whole comment process was utterly idiotic and pointless. You wasted everyone's time. 
Take a guess where I’m from. 

A dogfight is when dogs fight each other and actually bite. They go for the neck and it gets nasty fast if you aren’t ready to break it up, not nip and growl for a short scuffle. Yeah my westies will try to assert dominance over The dale and sometimes he’ll back down... again, not a fight. If they really went down to it, I would only have 1 terrier.


I’ve got nothing but time, I’m laid up after knee surgery and have all the time in the world to comment on anything and everything I see fit; that includes your BS about your toy dogs fighting with huskies and coming out on top. I’ll call BS on this crap all day long. I’m a dog man. I’ve been around all different types of working breeds my entire life. I have no problem arguing about this sort of thing when my opponent is so clearly just annoyed that somebody called him out, yet is clearly not willing to truly stand against my point. At this juncture, I’m gonna remind you that your dogs are weak shit bc they are only 10lbs; again this doesn’t take their overall value and loveability away, it’s just means they are itty bitty fucking dogs and big dogs will fuck up little dogs if they set into a fight... it’s quite simple.

Edit: words

I have a chihuahua that is 8 pounds of yappy asshole. He steals my daughter's dinner, no way in hell he would keep her safe, he'd probably eat her and use her like the tauntaun from Star Wars for warmth.
Play store link: [Relay for reddit](https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=free.reddit.news&referrer=utm_source%3DrelayFree%26utm_medium%3Dcomment%26utm_term%3Dorganic)  


 Not with this app u don't.
> Smaller the dog bigger the attitude

That's kind of what I was hinting at.
I have two, can concur.
My MIL had this happen recently
I'm just glad they were willing to spend money to save him.
Is...he okay?
Them German engineering didn't end up making dogs, they ended up making tanks.
You forgot also providing water for stock. 
Also good for yabbying! And I mean more like little kid yabbying with a single line that you slowly drag out, not a big net.
You need the mighty beaver in your life! Dams everywhere for free!
Bruh.   damn vs. dam


Back to before dudes got blew?

No thank you
"You gonna eat that? Aw, no looks like you're going to flush it. How about that? Okay, fine I guess I wasn't that hungry.."
Definitely. 

“You aren’t even going to save that for later!?!?!”
This is so cute. We need pics of this good, protector girl stat!!
We as a human species, very much are self-obsessed individuals, as the world burns around us, we generally do VERY little to help it, rather make things worse. We do not deserve the purity of a dogs love. Simple fact.


Yes, thank you! I grew up around a lot of really mean and nasty dogs who had no problem biting people. In fact, I never had a nice dog until we rescued our incredibly sweet girl named Annie a few years ago. Dogs have varied personalities just like we do, and some of those personalities are shitty. How much of that is nature vs how much is nurture is probably up for debate, but I'm no animal psychologist. What I do know is that shitty owners make for shitty-acting dogs, and owners like that are the only ones who don't deserve dogs.
Well, dogs do not bite for no reason. Probably your friend startled the dog while he was asleep or something similar 
How do you think he does it?
> in the woods.

in iowa, that's no big deal. in australia, it's a death sentence.
But he does have a supple wrist. . .


Dog would probably be safer driving than most of the elderly 
I still don't understand how a 3 year old was allowed to wander off like that. Maybe if I put my kid down for a nap and she snuck off, I'd lose sight of her for 20 minutes. This seems a touch negligent.
Never has a truer statement been typed. I'm a stay at home father/online student and I spend all day just stopping my two toddlers from doing things that could severely injure or kill them. Even when they get in trouble or hurt themselves in the process of doing whatever it was they go right back to it 3 seconds later.
Yea my 4 year old thinks everyone that comes to the door in a hat is his grandpa, and every fat guy is his uncle. Living in the Midwest that's like 3/4 of everyone so we installed chain locks at the top of both doors. He could probably reach with a bar stool from the island but by the time he drags one over there there's no chance in hell I haven't heard him and stopped him. 
tbh this sounds like a problem that could be easily solved with a lock on the kid instead of another lock on the door.  
You can buy a swing or chain lock for five bucks on amazon, takes no time to install and easy enough to remove and patch holes later! Not the most secure locks but would slow down a toddler who can’t reach them. 
Another option is a deadbolt with a keyhole on both sides, just hang the key out if reach 
My house has a double-keyed lock (that is, you need a key to open it from the inside or the outside).  We keep a key near the door, but our son doesn't know how to use it or where it is.  Quite a load off my mind.
OMG, that’s terrible 
I'm not surprised, late night escaped toddlers seems like a common story.  That was also a big reason for us buying door chains and a door jam we put at the top of our sliding glass door too. I'm a light sleeper so to unlock any of the doors he'd have to make enough noise t wake me up. There's always something you can buy. Even if you're a heavier sleeper hang big ass wind chimes from the top of the door or get one of those things that chimes when a window or door is open. Toddlers being crazy has been publicized for decades there's no excuse for not realizing that and preparing for it.
I'm just a little bit blind,
But I'm not scared!
I said
"I'm sticking by your side tiny hooman don't fear" 
Hey leave the moon out of this, it’s doing it’s best up there 
Hey, the moon needs love too. 
Now I have this image of dogs in little space suits bopping around on the moon. Humanities end game.
Oh you mean Cosmo. Just a shame the Collector has him
https://difundir.org/wp-content/uploads/2015/05/cosmo2-730x410.jpg
Moon-Moon > The Moon
Hey!  It's not his fault that he's an alabaster retard. 
And Humans are cats' greatest achievement.
The moon isn't out greatest achievement. Penicillin. Dwarf Wheat. Leashing Electricity. Open Heart Surgery. The moon is awesome. Space travel wonderful. But its a stepping stone. You don't get to take a step onto Everest and claim you summited it. We have a long way to go for space travel to be our greatest achievement. It will be. But it isnt yet.
The moon is years before our time 
As president, I hereby announce good boyes this year will see an increase of treats and walks!
[The people of Cormorant, MN agree with you](https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/dog-mayor-duke_us_57bbebf5e4b00d9c3a19cb19)
Fuck, a dog would be a better President than the orange man.
[Which is a shame, because even a pretty bad dog is a way better option than Brownback](http://thehill.com/homenews/campaign/373599-kansas-officials-say-dog-cant-run-for-governor)
Especially one that doesn't like dogs.
Guys stop I'm stuck at work all day and now I miss my dog
I don't put my company on a pedastal like that. To each their own, props to you for having an ego.
It's not about ego, it's about her never having to deal with heartbreak or loss.
They’re in junior high and edgy, they don’t understand this stuff yet 
I have a fourteen year old dog that I know I won’t have much longer. The only thing that makes me feel better is knowing she will have me beside her until the very end. I will not let her suffer but I will put up with any inconvenience to let her have every good day until she has left. I owe her that. She has given me her entire life and I hope to make sure it has been a good one.
This is the pure joy I find in rescuing dogs. I'll be damned if I don't miss my childhood dog that passed away, but I also love dogs and if I can take one in that had a rough past and show him an immense amount of love my home, I'm going to do it. They also tend to be fiercly loyal to their new owners, because you put the time and effort to work with them to be the good boy they always were. moral of my story dogs are the greatest thing ever and if anyone reading this is thinking of getting a dog, RESCUE DONT BUY!!!
The one that always gets me: Your dog may only be part of your world. But to your dog, your the whole world."
“It came to me that every time I lose a dog, they take a piece of my heart with them,
And every new dog who comes into my life gifts me with a piece of their heart.
If I live long enough, all the components of my heart will be a dog,
And I will become as loving and generous as they are.”

I keep relying on that one.
Fuck this, im an adult now. I need to keep my eyes dry.
Now to cheer you up, [a lighter take](http://theoatmeal.com/comics/dog_paradox).
This is awesome but I can’t figure out why they jump from the male to the female form when referring to the human hmmm
This is really nice, man - and seems to be written by yourself, as I can't see it elsewhere - but your account is really strange, I must say. 
It’s only a little poopie, dear friend.  All will be fine 
Imagine if she’d held onto the land till like now.  Be big ballin millionaire
Found the parents!
Paw Patrol, We’re on a roll!
Paw patrol, were on a roll!
Paw patrol is on a roll!
That sounds like dog heaven
*please woof*
Have a chihuahua/Schnauzer mix can confirm this ^. He is also the biggest mommas boy i have ever met.
Maybe.. train him?
That checks out. I'll allow it. 
uggg read that pre coffee... My bad
Hopefully she was noticed quickly by your FIL.
I'd probably start believing in god if my MIL jumped off the back of a truck and disappeared. 
Nothing ever came of it. Another time a few years later... he jumped out the window of the cab on the highway and ran into the woods. Never saw that crazy boi ever again lol
Like most things made up for the internet, the dog is doing just fine. 
This is the best comment. 
Around here it would also be good for gators.
I'm told they call that, "marriage".
K sorry was trying to sneak some fornite in while the lady sleeps. I found a few lol

Oso https://imgur.com/gallery/AVauQBM
So what you're saying is.. humans are still the root of the problem here?
I don't know
He felt the girl
A kid can go pretty far in 20 minutes. Especially judging by the description of the property, it was 10 acres in rural Australia.
How did we survive as a species?

Side note:... thanks Mom and Dad
One time, my son, in the blink of an eye, managed to climb over the baby gate, in to the kitchen, open the hot oven, and insert his arm.  And you're right, he probably would have done it again 3 seconds later just to be sure. 
> Even when they get in trouble or hurt themselves in the process of doing whatever it was they go right back to it 3 seconds later.

Can confirm this. Back when my friends daughter was 2 we were standing outside talking. This was summer in Florida. She would run into the road and start to scream and cry because he feet were burning (pavement in Florida gets HOT in summer). We would pick her up and put her back on the grass where she would stay until her feet cooled down and she stopped crying. Then she would do it all over again :/ Sometimes it's a wonder that any of them survive childhood at all.

Chain locks are a great idea. Thanks!
A dogs poem:

> I'm just a little bit blind  
But I'm not scared  
I'm sticking by your side, tiny hooman  
You need not fear
Tide still comes in, tide still goes out
My first girlfriend turned into the moon.
I got my period today, shout out to the moon for keeping that shit regular 
It’s a hollow space station and the dark side is populated with lizard people that are monitoring the progress of the spies they sent to Earth disguised as world leaders. It doesn’t need love.
This is the mirror universe *Isle of Dogs*.
There’s nothing in the rules that say a dog *can’t* be president...
What are you doing at work? Go home and hug your dog!
Lucky you, I'm away from home for a whole month and my dog is missing me too, which only further breaks my heart \(my wife told me she hasn't slept a single night on the bed as she always does when i'm home\).
I doubt the Chinese gov’t would let her
That was my first thought too. I am literally listening to Paw Patrol right now. "Chase is on the case!!!"
Ryder doesn't have parents or he has like the worst parents ever
Or the 4 year olds. 
We're on a roll!
While I was being facetious above, you're right. Small dogs generally aren't the problem. Small dog _owners_ are.
Really puts a new meaning to "the ol' ball and chain"
Lol nooo she saw it happens is what I meant to put xD
You seem pretty nonchalant about that.
I imagine they prob get crocs up north here. None of those down south where I am. Most we get are turtles. 
Haha! I can see some of the protector abilities from the last pic. She's like "No. No pics of the lady." :D
That deaf dumb and blind pooch sure was a good good dog
What makes him so good boy.
We survived because there was always that one kid who’s tragedy proved your parents weren’t fucking around.

“You hear so-and-so got killed playing with a gun? Did you hear Susie got hit by a car? Do you think she looked both ways?”
I swear baby gates just make children stronger faster. Gives them something to work out on and build strength so they can better escape.
There's also cheap alarms you can stick on with adhesive to alert you when the door opens. 
Can't explain that.
These Tide ads are getting ridiculous
Wax on, wax off.
No misscommunication

Roll tide?
Okay but just to be clear, the tides come in during new moon phase when the moon and sun tug team oceans together right? 
Tides itself are just the moon.

The moon is obviously less mass(the thing that produces gravity) but it's a lot closer than the sun.

The sun DOES have some impact so when the sun and moon align in a direction obviously we have higher floods or deeper ebb(spring tides).

Here on Belgian shores the difference between the 2 can easily be like 50 meters.(about 50 yards)
Roll tide!
It's a Tide ad.
No one cares Sokka! Why don’t you go find your boomerang or something?
Lizard people? Malarkey, the only thing up there are moon bears. 
The President must be at least 35... in dog years!
It's Hong Kong. Not China. There's still a difference for another 30 years
what do you mean? there are many chinese millionaires, the government doesn't maintain a population of poverty. and do you know the difference between HK and china? 
Papa Troll is playing in my house too, currently. I’ve grown to love it in a sick, Stockholm Syndrome type of way. Anything beats PJ Masks, I guess.
Rubble on the Double!
My daughter will loudly exclaim that “she is on the case!” when I’m looking for something. 
We are just seeing his imaginary world in his back yard where he plays with his dogs. 
I am convinced Ryder is young Bruce Wayne shortly after the death of his parents. Coping with their loss by fighting crime. He might be having hallucinations that dogs can talk, but otherwise he is doing ok.
Or he has parents who know he'll be safe with the magical super puppies he has around him at all times. Those things are capable of speech and operating machinery.
Almost like it never happened 
Sometimes you just gotta let em go. I had a rescue cat when I was young. Never wanted to leave the house, always chill for 3 years. One day, door was open like usual and he took off, never to be seen again.

I checked the local humane society for dead animals weekly for 6 months, checked with all our neighbors for a good mile or two in every direction. Nothing even closely matching him.

I figure he was picked up by some other house or took off and lived in one of the feral cat colonies in the area. Can't let something like that get to you, they're intelligent animals and have their own wants and desires. His dog and my cat just didn't want to live with us at that time.

I mean it sucks, but life goes on.

Runaway pet stories aren't always "they died and your parents lied to you to spare the pain". It happens.

Now if this damned neurotic ass Chihuahua I somehow inherited would run away that'd be great. Don't pad train your dogs people.
I was like 10, not a big deal 15 years later..
What would worying change? 

we get eels in our dams too
So...human sacrifice is the answer then?
I mean, I imagine your body really doesn’t want to keep laundry detergent inside of it.
"Tide pods"
Don’t you mean Forbidden Snacks
You can explain it. It's because of the magnets that the lizard people and Obama put in the clouds.
I still love them though
Wax on, ~~wax~~ wane off.
found lizard people ^
Almost any country can force you to sell your land, US included.
> what do you mean? there are many chinese millionaires

I think they are saying that the government may have forced her to sell the land to them, instead of letting her hold on to it.
I was typing this then you said it. Thank you, even if the ignorant comment has twice the points, thank you.
Did someone say TEAMWORK MAKES THE DREAMWORK!
On my fifth rewatch of all the episodes of Super Why as we speak. I've come to love the bitchin' guitar solo that plays "Hip, Hip, Hooray" over the closing credits.
I just want Romeo to win.
Yep. Paw patrol is a step up from Peppa I guess haha.
PJ Masks, we’re on our way!
I PREFER PJ Masks. Paw Patrol makes me so mad. 
What are you talking aboot?
I went to TJ Maxx and sang the theme song all the way through the store to drive my wife crazy.
If this was the twist ending of the final episode it would almost make all the hours I've spent watching this show worth it.
Mind. Is. Blown.
This is cannon in my head now
They're so fucking inefficient, it's infuriating. And they don't learn. Ryder, for Christ's sake, SEND ALL THE DOGS AT ONCE EVERY TIME
I would agree if stayed around town.  Thay kid goes to arctic enviroments, exploring ruins in the jungle, and even became a pirate or some shit.  
Yeah dogs regularly break chains, get run over and fall onto pavement going 60 miles an hour without the slightest bit of damage. And then just run away without anyone trying to find it. 
Sigh... There's always people like you in every thread.
Most of my dogs, while living with my dad, "ran away"
it is *an* answer!
No, I’m not trying to come up with an answer for “how can we make the survival rate 100%” because that’s just insane.

Why leave that comment? You trying to discredit me as a leader or some shit?
Clearly you've never met a millennial

^^^/s
And the great battle ensued
You mean have your family suddenly disappear?
No the govt buys the land and then a few months later there’s an accident or some how the family disappears. That way it looks like they boned out of where they were or something and the govt still gets their money back. 
That's fucking teamwork! 
For some reason, I always here, “Billy passed the third grade, oh what a glorious day...” when they plays. From Billy Madison in case anyone asks. 
a b c d e f g
h I j k lmnop
q r s and t u v
w x y and z

It's not far from what my 3yo does with our cats and dog. But they are lookin out for the invisible badguys
Also, the good folks of adventure bay rely entirely too much on the PP. they must have no other civil services.
